Nebraska, session 109, LB1112.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1112 LB1112
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Statewide Standardized Grading System Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Nebraska's school districts use varying grading scales and
definitions of academic proficiency, resulting in inconsistent measures
of student performance;
(b) Such inconsistency in measures of student performance creates
inequities for students transferring between school districts, enrolling
in option school districts, applying for scholarships, and meeting
graduation requirements; and
(c) A uniform statewide grading system promotes fairness,
transparency, and comparability of academic outcomes across the state.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a statewide
grading system and for such statewide grading system to be applied
uniformly in all public, private, parochial, and denominational schools.
Sec. 3. (1) On or before December 31, 2026, the State Department of
Education shall establish a statewide grading system. The statewide
grading system shall:
(a) Apply to all credit-bearing coursework in grades three through
twelve;
(b) Apply the same grading standards to resident students and
enrollment option students;
(c) Use a standard statewide grading scale;
(d) Align state academic content standards proficiency levels with
the standard statewide grading scale;
(e) Use consistent rules for the calculation of grades, numerical
rounding in the calculation of grades, treatment of late assignments, and
treatment of assessment results;
(f) Establish uniform weighting for courses designed for
exceptionally motivated and high-achieving students to provide more
academically or technically advanced learning than regular courses in the
-2-

LB1112 LB1112
2026 2026
same subject area and for courses designed to provide students with an
opportunity to earn postsecondary education credit or technical skill
credentials upon successful completion of such course; and
(g) Clear guidance for reporting grades on transcripts.
(2) Beginning with the 2027–2028 school year, each public, private,
parochial, and denominational school shall implement the statewide
grading system.
Sec. 4. Each school district shall measure the academic performance
of each student in the same manner whether the student is enrolled as a
resident student or as an enrollment option student.
Sec. 5. (1) Each school district shall publish the statewide
grading scale in all student handbooks, course catalogs, and on the
school district website.
(2) Each school district shall report student grades to the State
Department of Education in a standardized format to support statewide
comparability and public reporting.
(3) The department shall annually report to the Education Committee
of the Legislature on the implementation of and compliance with the
Statewide Standardized Grading System Act and on any recommended
adjustments. The report shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 6. The State Department of Education shall provide training
and technical assistance to school districts, teachers, and
administrators for implementation of the statewide grading system,
including evidence-based grading practices and equity-focused assessment
strategies.
Sec. 7. The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out the Statewide Standardized Grading System
Act.
Sec. 8. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 9. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-